Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska63-102
Books, pamphlets; printing copies in excess of contract prohibited.

It shall be unlawful for any person, firm or corporation who shall enter into contract for the printing, stereotyping, binding or publication of any book, pamphlet, circular, or other publication of any character or description, for any author, compiler or publisher, to print any greater number of copies of such book, pamphlet, circular, or other publication, than the number designated by the contract for such publication.

Laws 1905, c. 202, § 1, p. 695;

R.S.1913, § 5515;

C.S.1922, § 4811;

C.S.1929, § 63-102;

R.S.1943, § 63-102.